California, session 20252026, SB1140.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 17603.5 is added to the Education Code, to read:17603.5. (a) The governing board or body of a local educational agency shall ensure that the contract or contracts for any construction project taking place during school hours include security provisions that limit access to the construction site and keep unauthorized individuals off school property.(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Construction project” means all construction, alteration, demolition, installation, repair, and maintenance work performed on a schoolsite.(2) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or a charter school.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.SECTION 1.Section 32282 of the Education Code, as amended by Section 4 of Chapter 460 of the Statutes of 2025, is amended to read:32282.(a)The comprehensive school safety plan shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(1)Assessing the current status of crime committed on school campuses and at school-related functions.(2)Identifying appropriate strategies and programs that will provide or maintain a high level of school safety and address the school’s procedures for complying with existing laws related to school safety, which shall include the development of all of the following:(A)(i)Child abuse or neglect reporting procedures consistent with Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 11164) of Chapter 2 of Title 1 of Part 4 of the Penal Code.(ii)When a comprehensive school safety plan is next reviewed and updated, or by no later than July 1, 2026, procedures specifically designed to address the supervision and protection of children from child abuse or neglect or sex offenses.(B)(i)Disaster procedures, routine and emergency, including adaptations for pupils with disabilities in accordance with the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.), the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.), and Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794(a)). The disaster procedures shall also include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(I)Establishing an earthquake emergency procedure system in every public school building having an occupant capacity of 50 or more pupils or more than one classroom. A school district or county office of education may work with the Office of Emergency Services and the Alfred E. Alquist Seismic Safety Commission to develop and establish the earthquake emergency procedure system. The system shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(ia)A school building disaster plan, ready for implementation at any time, for maintaining the safety and care of pupils and staff. The department shall provide general direction to school districts and county offices of education on what to include in the school building disaster plan.(ib)A drop procedure whereby each pupil and staff member takes cover under a table or desk, dropping to their knees, with the head protected by the arms, and the back to the windows. A drop procedure practice shall be held at least once a school quarter in elementary schools and at least once a semester in secondary schools.(ic)Protective measures to be taken before, during, and following an earthquake.(id)A program to ensure that pupils and both the certificated and classified staff are aware of, and properly trained in, the earthquake emergency procedure system.(II)Establishing a procedure to allow a public agency, including the American Red Cross, to use school buildings, grounds, and equipment for mass care and welfare shelters during disasters or other emergencies affecting the public health and welfare. The school district or county office of education shall cooperate with the public agency in furnishing and maintaining the services as the school district or county office of education may deem necessary to meet the needs of the community.(III)(ia)Commencing with the 2026–27 fiscal year, establishing a procedure to identify appropriate refuge shelter for all pupils and staff to be used in the event of an evacuation order by local authorities and notify the operational area having jurisdiction within the school’s boundaries of this identified refuge, in order to first prioritize the safety of pupils and staff, and then the defense of that structure in the event of a fire. Each public school, including a charter school, serving more than 50 pupils in kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, that is in a high or very high fire hazard severity zone, identified pursuant to Section 51178 of the Government Code or Section 4204 of the Public Resources Code, shall coordinate the procedure with the operational area having jurisdiction within the school’s boundaries. For those schools under the jurisdiction of a school district or county office of education, the school district or county office of education shall be the entity that coordinates with the operational area having jurisdiction within each of the school’s boundaries.(ib)Commencing with the 2026–27 fiscal year, the development by each public school, including a charter school, serving more than 50 pupils in kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, that is in a high or very high fire hazard severity zone, identified pursuant to Section 51178 of the Government Code or Section 4204 of the Public Resources Code, of a communication and evacuation plan, to be used in the event of an early notice evacuation warning, that allows enough time to evacuate all pupils and staff. These plans shall clearly identify a decision process to determine whether an evacuation order is appropriate.(ic)For purposes of this subclause, “operational area” means an intermediate level of the state emergency services organization, consisting of a county and all political subdivisions within the county area, that serves as a link in the system of communication and coordination between the state’s emergency operation centers and the operating centers of the political subdivisions that make up the operational area, as described in subdivision (b) of Section 8559 of the Government Code and Section 8605 of the Government Code.(ii)The evaluation of a comprehensive school safety plan pursuant to subdivision (d) and the review of a school safety plan pursuant to clause (iii) of subparagraph (F) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 47605 or clause (iii) of subparagraph (G) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 47605.6, as applicable, shall include ensuring that the plan includes appropriate adaptations for pupils with disabilities, as required pursuant to clause (i).(iii)(I)After the first evaluation or review, as applicable, for purposes of subdivision (d) and clause (ii) is conducted, and after each annual evaluation or review thereafter, a school employee, a pupil’s parent, guardian, or educational rights holder, or a pupil themselves may bring concerns about an individual pupil’s ability to access disaster safety procedures described in the comprehensive school safety plan or the school safety plan to the school principal. If the school principal determines there is merit to a concern, the principal shall direct the schoolsite council, school safety planning committee, or charter school, as applicable, to make appropriate modifications to the comprehensive school safety plan or school safety plan, as applicable, during the evaluation of the comprehensive school safety plan pursuant to subdivision (d) or the review of the school safety plan pursuant to clause (iii) of subparagraph (F) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 47605 or clause (iii) of subparagraph (G) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 47605.6, as applicable. The school principal may direct the schoolsite council, the school safety planning committee, or the charter school, as applicable, to make such modifications before the evaluation of the comprehensive school safety plan pursuant to subdivision (d) or the review of the school safety plan pursuant to clause (iii) of subparagraph (F) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 47605 or clause (iii) of subparagraph (G) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 47605.6, as applicable.(II)Subclause (I) does not prohibit a school employee, a pupil’s parent, guardian, or educational rights holder, or a pupil themselves from bringing their concerns to the school principal before an evaluation or review, as applicable, for purposes of subdivision (d) and clause (ii) is conducted.(iv)All deliberations of the schoolsite council, school safety planning committee, or charter school, as applicable, related to individual pupils with disabilities for purposes of the requirements of clauses (i) to (iii), inclusive, shall be subject to applicable state and federal laws regarding the privacy of pupil information.(C)Policies pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 48915 for pupils who committed an act listed in subdivision (c) of Section 48915 and other school-designated serious acts that would lead to suspension, expulsion, or mandatory expulsion recommendations pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 48900) of Chapter 6 of Part 27 of Division 4 of Title 2.(D)Procedures to notify teachers of dangerous pupils pursuant to Section 49079.(E)A discrimination and harassment policy consistent with the prohibition against discrimination contained in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 200) of Part 1.(F)The provisions of any schoolwide dress code, pursuant to Section 35183, that prohibits pupils from wearing “gang-related apparel,” if the school has adopted that type of a dress code. For those purposes, the comprehensive school safety plan shall define “gang-related apparel.” The definition shall be limited to apparel that, if worn or displayed on a school campus, reasonably could be determined to threaten the health and safety of the school environment. A schoolwide dress code established pursuant to this section and Section 35183 shall be enforced on the school campus and at any school-sponsored activity by the principal of the school or the person designated by the principal. For purposes of this subparagraph, “gang-related apparel” shall not be considered a protected form of speech pursuant to Section 48950.(G)Procedures for safe ingress and egress of pupils, parents, and school employees to and from school and plans to exclude unauthorized individuals from school property by limiting access points during construction, facilities maintenance, and repair projects.(H)A safe and orderly environment conducive to learning at the school.(I)The rules and procedures on school discipline adopted pursuant to Sections 35291, 35291.5, 47605, and 47605.6.(J)Procedures for conducting tactical responses to criminal incidents, including procedures related to individuals with guns on school campuses and at school-related functions. The procedures to prepare for active shooters or other armed assailants shall be based on the specific needs and context of each school and community.(K)If a comprehensive school safety plan includes procedures to prepare for active shooters or other armed assailants by conducting a drill, a school shall comply with all of the following relating to the drill:(i)(I)The school shall not conduct a high-intensity drill.(II)For purposes of this clause, “high-intensity drill” means a drill that includes simulations that mimic an actual school shooter or other armed assailant incident, including, but not limited to, theatrical makeup or other materials to give an image of blood or gunshot wounds, acting by an individual posing to be the assailant, acting by individuals posing as victims, or simulations that instruct pupils to actively resist an assailant by throwing objects, attacking, or swarming the assailant.(ii)The school shall not include the use of real weapons, gunfire blanks, or explosions in the conducting of the drill.(iii)The school shall ensure a trauma-informed approach to the design and execution of any drill, which shall include all of the following:(I)Age-appropriate and developmentally appropriate drill content and terminology developed with the involvement of school personnel, including school-based mental health professionals.(II)Notice to all parents and guardians of pupils, teachers, administrators, and school personnel subject to the drills in advance of the drill and of the drill’s expected length of time.(III)The ability for parents or guardians to opt their child or children out of the drills.(IV)An announcement to pupils and educators immediately before the start of the drills and an announcement to pupils and educators immediately after the drills have concluded.(V)A notice to all parents and guardians after the drill has concluded.(VI)The provision of contact information for community-based resources, including local organizations with objectives to reduce gun violence or provide mental health counseling, to parents or guardians, pupils, and staff who are negatively impacted by the drills, and, where available, prioritizing school-based resources.(L)Procedures to assess and respond to reports of any dangerous, violent, or unlawful activity that is being conducted or threatened to be conducted at the school, at an activity sponsored by the school, or on a schoolbus serving the school.(M)(i)When a comprehensive school safety plan is next reviewed and updated on or after July 1, 2025, procedures to respond to incidents involving an individual experiencing a sudden cardiac arrest or a similar life-threatening medical emergency while on school grounds.(ii)The procedures described in clause (i) are encouraged to integrate evidence-based core elements, including any cardiopulmonary resuscitation training offered and the placement of any automated external defibrillator available on the schoolsite in accordance with nationally recognized evidence-based emergency cardiac care guidelines, as dictated by the school safety plan.(N)For schools that serve pupils in any of grades 7 to 12, inclusive, a protocol in the event a pupil is suffering or is reasonably believed to be suffering from an opioid overdose.(3)(A)Beginning July 1, 2025, an instructional continuity plan to establish communication with pupils and their families and provide instruction to pupils when in-person instruction is disrupted due to an emergency pursuant to Section 41422 or subdivision (a) of Section 46392. The plan shall include all the following:(i)Procedures for pupil engagement, as soon as practicable, and no later than five calendar days following the emergency. Procedures shall be designed to establish two-way communication with pupils and their families and identify and provide supports for pupils’ social-emotional, mental health, and academic needs.(ii)A plan to provide access to in-person instruction or remote instruction pursuant to Sections 51747 and 51749.5, as soon as practicable, but no later than 10 instructional days following the emergency. The plan may include support to pupils and families to enroll in or be temporarily reassigned to another school district, county office of education, or charter school.(B)Local educational agencies are encouraged to plan to meet instructional standards that are at least equivalent to those applicable to independent study programs.(C)(i)For purposes of this paragraph, “temporarily reassigned” means temporarily reassigned to another local educational agency outside of the school district, but within the county or an immediately adjacent county, in which the pupil’s parent or guardian resides. Notwithstanding Section 48200 or any other law, a pupil who is temporarily reassigned shall be deemed to have complied with the residency requirements for attendance in the local educational agency that is temporarily serving the pupil pursuant to this section.(ii)Notwithstanding Section 48200 or any other law, a school district, county office of education, or charter school may continue to enroll a pupil who is temporarily reassigned to another school district, county office of education, or charter school pursuant to this section in order to facilitate the timely reentry of the pupil in their prior school after the emergency event has ended.(D)This paragraph applies to school districts, county offices of education, and charter schools.(b)It is the intent of the Legislature that schools develop comprehensive school safety plans using existing resources, including the materials and services of the partnership, pursuant to this chapter. It is also the intent of the Legislature that schools use the handbook developed and distributed in partnership by the department’s Safe Schools and Violence Prevention Center and the Attorney General’s Crime and Violence Prevention Center entitled “Safe Schools: A Planning Guide for Action” in conjunction with developing their plan for school safety.(c)Each schoolsite council or school safety planning committee, in developing and updating a comprehensive school safety plan, shall, where practical, consult, cooperate, and coordinate with other schoolsite councils or school safety planning committees.(d)The comprehensive school safety plan may be evaluated and amended, as needed, by the school safety planning committee, but shall be evaluated at least once a year, to ensure that the comprehensive school safety plan is properly implemented. An updated file of all safety-related plans and materials shall be readily available for inspection by the public.(e)As comprehensive school safety plans are reviewed and updated, the Legislature encourages all plans, to the extent that resources are available, to include policies and procedures aimed at the prevention of bullying.(f)The comprehensive school safety plan, as written and updated by the schoolsite council or school safety planning committee, shall be submitted for approval pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 32288.(g)The department shall maintain and conspicuously post on its internet website a compliance checklist for developing a comprehensive school safety plan, and shall update the checklist when necessary.(h)On or before March 1, 2025, the Superintendent shall develop and post on the department’s internet website instructional continuity plan guidance, including guidance for continued academic and school engagement strategies during disruptions in instruction due to emergencies.SEC. 2.Section 32282 of the Education Code, as amended by Section 4.5 of Chapter 460 of the Statutes of 2025, is amended to read:32282.(a)The comprehensive school safety plan shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(1)Assessing the current status of crime committed on school campuses and at school-related functions.(2)Identifying appropriate strategies and programs that will provide or maintain a high level of school safety and address the school’s procedures for complying with existing laws related to school safety, which shall include the development of all of the following:(A)(i)Child abuse or neglect reporting procedures consistent with Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 11164) of Chapter 2 of Title 1 of Part 4 of the Penal Code.(ii)When a comprehensive school safety plan is next reviewed and updated, or by no later than July 1, 2026, procedures specifically designed to address the supervision and protection of children from child abuse or neglect or sex offenses.(B)(i)Disaster procedures, routine and emergency, including adaptations for pupils with disabilities in accordance with the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.), the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.), and Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794(a)). The disaster procedures shall also include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(I)Establishing an earthquake emergency procedure system in every public school building having an occupant capacity of 50 or more pupils or more than one classroom. A school district or county office of education may work with the Office of Emergency Services and the Alfred E. Alquist Seismic Safety Commission to develop and establish the earthquake emergency procedure system. The system shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(ia)A school building disaster plan, ready for implementation at any time, for maintaining the safety and care of pupils and staff. The department shall provide general direction to school districts and county offices of education on what to include in the school building disaster plan.(ib)A drop procedure whereby each pupil and staff member takes cover under a table or desk, dropping to their knees, with the head protected by the arms, and the back to the windows. A drop procedure practice shall be held at least once a school quarter in elementary schools and at least once a semester in secondary schools.(ic)Protective measures to be taken before, during, and following an earthquake.(id)A program to ensure that pupils and both the certificated and classified staff are aware of, and properly trained in, the earthquake emergency procedure system.(II)Establishing a procedure to allow a public agency, including the American Red Cross, to use school buildings, grounds, and equipment for mass care and welfare shelters during disasters or other emergencies affecting the public health and welfare. The school district or county office of education shall cooperate with the public agency in furnishing and maintaining the services as the school district or county office of education may deem necessary to meet the needs of the community.(III)(ia)Commencing with the 2026–27 fiscal year, establishing a procedure to identify appropriate refuge shelter for all pupils and staff to be used in the event of an evacuation order by local authorities and notify the operational area having jurisdiction within the school’s boundaries of this identified refuge, in order to first prioritize the safety of pupils and staff, and then the defense of that structure in the event of a fire. Each public school, including a charter school, serving more than 50 pupils in kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, that is in a high or very high fire hazard severity zone, identified pursuant to Section 51178 of the Government Code or Section 4204 of the Public Resources Code, shall coordinate the procedure with the operational area having jurisdiction within the school’s boundaries. For those schools under the jurisdiction of a school district or county office of education, the school district or county office of education shall be the entity that coordinates with the operational area having jurisdiction within each of the school’s boundaries.(ib)Commencing with the 2026–27 fiscal year, the development by each public school, including a charter school, serving more than 50 pupils in kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, that is in a high or very high fire hazard severity zone, identified pursuant to Section 51178 of the Government Code or Section 4204 of the Public Resources Code, of a communication and evacuation plan, to be used in the event of an early notice evacuation warning, that allows enough time to evacuate all pupils and staff. These plans shall clearly identify a decision process to determine whether an evacuation order is appropriate.(ic)For purposes of this subclause, “operational area” means an intermediate level of the state emergency services organization, consisting of a county and all political subdivisions within the county area, that serves as a link in the system of communication and coordination between the state’s emergency operation centers and the operating centers of the political subdivisions that make up the operational area, as described in subdivision (b) of Section 8559 of the Government Code and Section 8605 of the Government Code.(ii)The evaluation of a comprehensive school safety plan pursuant to subdivision (d) and the review of a school safety plan pursuant to clause (iii) of subparagraph (F) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 47605 or clause (iii) of subparagraph (G) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 47605.6, as applicable, shall include ensuring that the plan includes appropriate adaptations for pupils with disabilities, as required pursuant to clause (i).(iii)(I)After the first evaluation or review, as applicable, for purposes of subdivision (d) and clause (ii) is conducted, and after each annual evaluation or review thereafter, a school employee, a pupil’s parent, guardian, or educational rights holder, or a pupil themselves may bring concerns about an individual pupil’s ability to access disaster safety procedures described in the comprehensive school safety plan or the school safety plan to the school principal. If the school principal determines there is merit to a concern, the principal shall direct the schoolsite council, school safety planning committee, or charter school, as applicable, to make appropriate modifications to the comprehensive school safety plan or school safety plan, as applicable, during the evaluation of the comprehensive school safety plan pursuant to subdivision (d) or the review of the school safety plan pursuant to clause (iii) of subparagraph (F) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 47605 or clause (iii) of subparagraph (G) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 47605.6, as applicable. The school principal may direct the schoolsite council, the school safety planning committee, or the charter school, as applicable, to make such modifications before the evaluation of the comprehensive school safety plan pursuant to subdivision (d) or the review of the school safety plan pursuant to clause (iii) of subparagraph (F) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 47605 or clause (iii) of subparagraph (G) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 47605.6, as applicable.(II)Subclause (I) does not prohibit a school employee, a pupil’s parent, guardian, or educational rights holder, or a pupil themselves from bringing their concerns to the school principal before an evaluation or review, as applicable, for purposes of subdivision (d) and clause (ii) is conducted.(iv)All deliberations of the schoolsite council, school safety planning committee, or charter school, as applicable, related to individual pupils with disabilities for purposes of the requirements of clauses (i) to (iii), inclusive, shall be subject to applicable state and federal laws regarding the privacy of pupil information.(C)Policies pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 48915 for pupils who committed an act listed in subdivision (c) of Section 48915 and other school-designated serious acts that would lead to suspension, expulsion, or mandatory expulsion recommendations pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 48900) of Chapter 6 of Part 27 of Division 4 of Title 2.(D)Procedures to notify teachers of dangerous pupils pursuant to Section 49079.(E)A discrimination and harassment policy consistent with the prohibition against discrimination contained in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 200) of Part 1.(F)The provisions of any schoolwide dress code, pursuant to Section 35183, that prohibits pupils from wearing “gang-related apparel,” if the school has adopted that type of a dress code. For those purposes, the comprehensive school safety plan shall define “gang-related apparel.” The definition shall be limited to apparel that, if worn or displayed on a school campus, reasonably could be determined to threaten the health and safety of the school environment. A schoolwide dress code established pursuant to this section and Section 35183 shall be enforced on the school campus and at any school-sponsored activity by the principal of the school or the person designated by the principal. For purposes of this subparagraph, “gang-related apparel” shall not be considered a protected form of speech pursuant to Section 48950.(G)Procedures for safe ingress and egress of pupils, parents, and school employees to and from school and plans to exclude unauthorized individuals from school property by limiting access points during construction, facilities maintenance, and repair projects.(H)A safe and orderly environment conducive to learning at the school.(I)The rules and procedures on school discipline adopted pursuant to Sections 35291, 35291.5, 47605, and 47605.6.(J)Procedures for conducting tactical responses to criminal incidents, including procedures related to individuals with guns on school campuses and at school-related functions. The procedures to prepare for active shooters or other armed assailants shall be based on the specific needs and context of each school and community.(K)If a comprehensive school safety plan includes procedures to prepare for active shooters or other armed assailants by conducting a drill, a school shall comply with all of the following relating to the drill:(i)(I)The school shall not conduct a high-intensity drill.(II)For purposes of this clause, “high-intensity drill” means a drill that includes simulations that mimic an actual school shooter or other armed assailant incident, including, but not limited to, theatrical makeup or other materials to give an image of blood or gunshot wounds, acting by an individual posing to be the assailant, acting by individuals posing as victims, or simulations that instruct pupils to actively resist an assailant by throwing objects, attacking, or swarming the assailant.(ii)The school shall not include the use of real weapons, gunfire blanks, or explosions in the conducting of the drill.(iii)The school shall ensure a trauma-informed approach to the design and execution of any drill, which shall include all of the following:(I)Age-appropriate and developmentally appropriate drill content and terminology developed with the involvement of school personnel, including school-based mental health professionals.(II)Notice to all parents and guardians of pupils, teachers, administrators, and school personnel subject to the drills in advance of the drill and of the drill’s expected length of time.(III)The ability for parents or guardians to opt their child or children out of the drills.(IV)An announcement to pupils and educators immediately before the start of the drills and an announcement to pupils and educators immediately after the drills have concluded.(V)A notice to all parents and guardians after the drill has concluded.(VI)The provision of contact information for community-based resources, including local organizations with objectives to reduce gun violence or provide mental health counseling, to parents or guardians, pupils, and staff who are negatively impacted by the drills, and, where available, prioritizing school-based resources.(L)Procedures to assess and respond to reports of any dangerous, violent, or unlawful activity that is being conducted or threatened to be conducted at the school, at an activity sponsored by the school, or on a schoolbus serving the school.(M)(i)When a comprehensive school safety plan is next reviewed and updated on or after July 1, 2025, procedures to respond to incidents involving an individual experiencing a sudden cardiac arrest or a similar life-threatening medical emergency while on school grounds.(ii)The procedures described in clause (i) are encouraged to integrate evidence-based core elements, including any cardiopulmonary resuscitation training offered and the placement of any automated external defibrillator available on the schoolsite in accordance with nationally recognized evidence-based emergency cardiac care guidelines, as dictated by the school safety plan.(N)(i)When a comprehensive school safety plan is next reviewed and updated, but by no later than March 1, 2026, procedures specifically designed to notify parents and guardians of pupils, teachers, administrators, and school personnel when the school confirms the presence of immigration enforcement on the schoolsite.(ii)The content and timing of a notification provided under the procedures in clause (i) shall consider the safety and well-being of the pupils, employees, and community members of the schoolsite when determining when and how to issue the notification to parents and guardians of pupils, teachers, administrators, and school personnel.(iii)The notification provided under the procedures in clause (i) may also include a hyperlink to additional resources for families with information about their educational rights, state laws that protects parents’ and students’ privacy and confidentiality, and, if available, counseling or support services, which may include services that support families impacted by immigration enforcement and model policies adopted by the local educational agency pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 234.7.(iv)A notification provided under the procedures in clause (i) shall not include any personally identifiable information.(v)For purposes of this subparagraph, “immigration enforcement” includes any and all efforts to investigate, enforce, or assist in the investigation or enforcement of any federal civil immigration law, and also includes any and all efforts to investigate, enforce, or assist in the investigation or enforcement of any federal criminal immigration law that penalizes a person’s presence in, entry, or reentry to, or employment in, the United States.(O)For schools that serve pupils in any of grades 7 to 12, inclusive, a protocol in the event a pupil is suffering or is reasonably believed to be suffering from an opioid overdose.(3)(A)Beginning July 1, 2025, an instructional continuity plan to establish communication with pupils and their families and provide instruction to pupils when in-person instruction is disrupted due to an emergency pursuant to Section 41422 or subdivision (a) of Section 46392. The plan shall include all the following:(i)Procedures for pupil engagement, as soon as practicable, and no later than five calendar days following the emergency. Procedures shall be designed to establish two-way communication with pupils and their families and identify and provide supports for pupils’ social-emotional, mental health, and academic needs.(ii)A plan to provide access to in-person instruction or remote instruction pursuant to Sections 51747 and 51749.5, as soon as practicable, but no later than 10 instructional days following the emergency. The plan may include support to pupils and families to enroll in or be temporarily reassigned to another school district, county office of education, or charter school.(B)Local educational agencies are encouraged to plan to meet instructional standards that are at least equivalent to those applicable to independent study programs.(C)(i)For purposes of this paragraph, “temporarily reassigned” means temporarily reassigned to another local educational agency outside of the school district, but within the county or an immediately adjacent county, in which the pupil’s parent or guardian resides. Notwithstanding Section 48200 or any other law, a pupil who is temporarily reassigned shall be deemed to have complied with the residency requirements for attendance in the local educational agency that is temporarily serving the pupil pursuant to this section.(ii)Notwithstanding Section 48200 or any other law, a school district, county office of education, or charter school may continue to enroll a pupil who is temporarily reassigned to another school district, county office of education, or charter school pursuant to this section in order to facilitate the timely reentry of the pupil in their prior school after the emergency event has ended.(D)This paragraph applies to school districts, county offices of education, and charter schools.(b)It is the intent of the Legislature that schools develop comprehensive school safety plans using existing resources, including the materials and services of the partnership, pursuant to this chapter. It is also the intent of the Legislature that schools use the handbook developed and distributed in partnership by the department’s Safe Schools and Violence Prevention Center and the Attorney General’s Crime and Violence Prevention Center entitled “Safe Schools: A Planning Guide for Action” in conjunction with developing their plan for school safety.(c)Each schoolsite council or school safety planning committee, in developing and updating a comprehensive school safety plan, shall, where practical, consult, cooperate, and coordinate with other schoolsite councils or school safety planning committees.(d)The comprehensive school safety plan may be evaluated and amended, as needed, by the school safety planning committee, but shall be evaluated at least once a year, to ensure that the comprehensive school safety plan is properly implemented. An updated file of all safety-related plans and materials shall be readily available for inspection by the public.(e)As comprehensive school safety plans are reviewed and updated, the Legislature encourages all plans, to the extent that resources are available, to include policies and procedures aimed at the prevention of bullying.(f)The comprehensive school safety plan, as written and updated by the schoolsite council or school safety planning committee, shall be submitted for approval pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 32288.(g)The department shall maintain and conspicuously post on its internet website a compliance checklist for developing a comprehensive school safety plan, and shall update the checklist when necessary.(h)On or before March 1, 2025, the Superintendent shall develop and post on the department’s internet website instructional continuity plan guidance, including guidance for continued academic and school engagement strategies during disruptions in instruction due to emergencies.(i)This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 3.If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.